District of Columbia statutes.
1-819.06

Full faith and credit.

Federal obligations for benefits under this chapter are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 730, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11096
renumbered as § 11086, Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3966, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(a)(1), (2)
2001 Ed., § 1-817.06.
1981 Ed., § 1-769.6.